Tennessee, session 114, HB2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of health shall conduct a study using existing resources
of the requirements to obtain prescription medications via telehealth in neighboring states. The
purpose of the study is to determine the restrictions upon prescribers issuing prescription
medications via telehealth, and compare such restrictions to those on prescribers in this state.
The commissioner shall compile the findings from the study into a report and transmit a copy of
the report to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the
legislative librarian no later than December 31, 2026. The commissioner may publish and
transmit the report by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2131
012591
- 1 -